Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2236
Continuing education; requirements.

(1) Every credential holder shall furnish evidence to the board that he or she has satisfactorily completed no fewer than twenty-eight hours of approved continuing education activities in each two-year continuing education period. Hours of satisfactorily completed approved continuing education activities cannot be carried over from one two-year continuing education period to another. Evidence of successful completion of such continuing education activities for the two-year continuing education period, including passing examination if applicable, shall be submitted to the board in the manner prescribed by the board. No continuing education activity shall be less than two hours in duration. A person who holds a temporary credential does not have to meet any continuing education requirements in the Real Property Appraiser Act.

(2) As prescribed by rules and regulations of the Real Property Appraiser Board and at least once every two years, the seven-hour National Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice Continuing Education Course as approved by the Appraiser Qualifications Board or the equivalent of the course as approved by the Real Property Appraiser Board, shall be included in the continuing education requirement of each credential holder. An instructor certified by the Appraiser Qualifications Board satisfies this requirement by successfully completing an instructor recertification course and examination, if applicable, as approved by the Appraiser Qualifications Board.

(3) A continuing education activity conducted in another jurisdiction in which the activity is approved to meet the continuing education requirements for renewal of a credential in such other jurisdiction shall be accepted by the board if that jurisdiction has adopted and enforces standards for such continuing education activity that meet or exceed the standards established by the Real Property Appraiser Act and the rules and regulations of the board.

(4) The board may adopt a program of continuing education for individual credentials as long as the program is compliant with the Appraiser Qualifications Board's criteria specific to continuing education.

(5) No more than fourteen hours may be approved by the Real Property Appraiser Board as continuing education in each two-year continuing education period for participation, other than as a student, in appraisal educational processes and programs, which includes teaching, program development, authorship of textbooks, or similar activities that are determined by the board to be equivalent to obtaining continuing education. Evidence of participation shall be submitted to the board upon completion of the appraisal educational process or program. No preapproval will be granted for participation in appraisal educational processes or programs.

(6) As prescribed by rules and regulations of the Real Property Appraiser Board, qualifying education, as approved by the board, successfully completed by a credential holder shall be approved by the board as continuing education.

(7) Beginning January 1, 2026, as prescribed by rules and regulations of the Real Property Appraiser Board and at least once every two years, a successfully completed board-approved valuation bias and fair housing laws course shall be included in the continuing education requirement of each credential holder.

(8) A board-approved supervisory real property appraiser and trainee course successfully completed by a certified real property appraiser shall be approved by the board as continuing education no more than once during each two-year continuing education period.

(9) The Real Property Appraiser Board shall approve continuing education activities and instructors which it determines would protect the public by improving the competency of credential holders.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 40;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 37;

Laws 1997, LB 29, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 28;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 58;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB714, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 22;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 56;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 17;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 32;

Laws 2019, LB77, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 82;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 58;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 16.